Nebraska, session 109, LB129.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB129 LB129
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-407, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-407 (1) For purposes of this section, energy source means any
fuel or power source used to power an engine, including aviation fuel,
biofuel, compressed or liquified natural gas, diesel fuel including
renewable diesel and biodiesel blended fuel, electricity used for
charging electric vehicles, gasoline including ethanol blended gasoline,
gas distillates, hydrogen, and liquified petroleum gas.
(2) (1) No county, city, village, or other political subdivision of
the state shall enact or implement any ordinance, code, resolution, rule,
regulation, or policy that restricts, prohibits, or has the effect of
restricting or prohibiting any energy source the types or fuel sources of
energy that may be used, delivered, converted, or supplied by the
following entities to serve customers that such entities are authorized
to serve:
(a) A natural gas utility;
(b) A natural gas transmission company; or
(c) A retail marketer or dispenser of propane; or .
(d) A retail marketer of any other energy source.
(2) This section does not apply to ordinances, codes, resolutions,
rules, regulations, or policies:
(a) Governing a natural gas utility owned or operated and directly
controlled by a city or village; or
(b) Regulating a retail marketer or dispenser of propane.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-407, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-